Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5204
Creation of land bank; procedure;
use of Interlocal Cooperation Act; goal of land bank.

(1) A municipality may elect to create
a land bank by the adoption of an ordinance which specifies the following:

(a) The name
of the land bank;

(b) The initial individuals to serve as members of the board and
the length of terms for which they are to serve; and

(c) The qualifications
and terms of office of members of the board.

(2) Two or more municipalities
may elect to enter into an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation
Act to create a single land bank to act on behalf of such municipalities,
which agreement shall contain the information required by subsection (1) of
this section.

(3) Each land bank created pursuant to the Nebraska Municipal Land
Bank Act shall be deemed to be a public corporation acting in a governmental
capacity and a political subdivision of the state and shall have permanent
and perpetual duration until terminated and dissolved in accordance with section
19-5214.

(4) The primary goal of any land bank shall be to facilitate the
return of vacant, abandoned, and tax-delinquent properties to productive use.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 4.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.